Maryland, session 2025, HB0399.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
13–501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Commissioner” means the Baltimore City Police Commissioner.
(C) “DESIGNATED CITY AGENCY” MEANS AN AGENCY DESIGNATED BY THE
BALTIMORE CITY GOVERNMENT.
(D) (1) “ELECTRONIC DEVICE” MEANS A DEVICE THAT IS CAPABLE OF
TRANSMITTING, RECEIVING, OR RECORDING MESSAGES, IMAGES, SOUNDS, DATA, OR
OTHER INFORMATION BY ELECTRONIC MEANS OR THAT, IN APPEARANCE,
PURPORTS TO BE A CELL PHONE, COMPUTER, OR OTHER SUCH DEVICE.
(2) “ELECTRONIC DEVICE” INCLUDES A CELL PHONE OR COMPUTER.
(3) “ELECTRONIC DEVICE” DOES NOT INCLUDE A VIDEO LOTTERY
TERMINAL AS DEFINED UNDER § 9–1A–01 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
[(c)] (E) “Gaming event” means a carnival, bazaar, or raffle.
(F) (1) “GEOFENCE” MEANS TECHNOLOGY THAT ESTABLISHES A
VIRTUAL GEOGRAPHICAL BOUNDARY.
(2) “GEOFENCE” INCLUDES BOUNDARIES THAT ARE ESTABLISHED
OR MONITORED THROUGH THE USE OF:
(I) GLOBAL POSITIONING TECHNOLOGY;
(II) CELL TOWER CONNECTIVITY;
(III) CELLULAR DATA;
(IV) RADIO FREQUENCY IDENTIFICATION;
(V) WIRELESS FIDELITY TECHNOLOGY; OR
(VI) ANY OTHER FORM OF LOCATION DETERMINATION
TECHNOLOGY.

HOUSE BILL 399 3
[(d)] (G) “Raffle” means one or more drawings from a single series of chances
sold [from chance books].
13–503.
(a) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A RAFFLE AUTHORIZED UNDER §
13–505.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) Before an organization listed in subsection [(b)] (C) of this section may operate
a gaming event, the organization shall obtain a permit from the commissioner.
[(b)] (C) (1) An organization that meets the conditions of paragraph (2) of this
subsection may conduct a gaming event for the benefit of any of the following listed
organizations if the organization is a bona fide:
(i) religious organization;
(ii) fraternal organization;
(iii) civic organization;
(iv) veterans’ hospital;
(v) amateur athletic organization in which all playing members are
under the age of 18 years; or
(vi) charitable organization.
(2) An organization conducting a gaming event shall:
(i) be located in Baltimore City; and
(ii) spend a majority of the organization’s funds in Baltimore City
for:
1. fraternal purposes;
2. civic purposes;
3. purposes related to a veterans’ hospital;
4. purposes related to amateur athletics; or
5. charitable purposes.

HOUSE BILL 399
[(c)] (D) (1) Before the commissioner may issue a permit, the commissioner
shall review the character of the organization applying for the permit to ascertain that the
organization meets the requirements of §§ 13–503 through 13–505 of this subtitle.
(2) The commissioner shall make any application for a permit and the
action taken by the commissioner on that application a matter of public record.
[(d)] (E) (1) The permit shall state that the gaming event shall be managed
and operated personally only by members of the organization obtaining the permit.
(2) The permit is not transferable.
[(e)] (F) An organization conducting a gaming event in Baltimore City may not
allow an individual or group of individuals to:
(1) benefit financially from the gaming event; or
(2) receive any of the proceeds of the gaming event for personal use or
benefit.
13–505.
(a) A permit holder may award prizes in merchandise and money in a raffle in
any amount.
(b) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 13–505.1(D)(1)(II) OF THIS SUBTITLE, A
permit holder may not conduct more than 12 raffles in a calendar year.
13–505.1.
(A) A RAFFLE MAY BE CONDUCTED BY AN ORGANIZATION THAT:
(1) IS LOCATED IN BALTIMORE CITY;
(2) SPENDS A MAJORITY OF THE ORGANIZATION’S FUNDS IN
BALTIMORE CITY FOR:
(I) FRATERNAL PURPOSES;
(II) CIVIC PURPOSES;
(III) PURPOSES RELATED TO A VETERANS’ HOSPITAL;
(IV) PURPOSES RELATED TO AMATEUR ATHLETICS; OR
(V) CHARITABLE PURPOSES; AND

HOUSE BILL 399 5
(3) IS AFFILIATED WITH A PROFESSIONAL MAJOR LEAGUE BASEBALL
TEAM THAT PLAYS ITS HOME GAMES IN BALTIMORE CITY.
(B) (1) BEFORE CONDUCTING A RAFFLE, AN ORGANIZATION SHALL
OBTAIN A WRITTEN PERMIT FROM THE DESIGNATED CITY AGENCY.
(2) BEFORE ISSUING A PERMIT, THE DESIGNATED CITY AGENCY
SHALL ASCERTAIN THE CHARACTER OF THE ORGANIZATION TO DETERMINE IF THE
PERMIT SHOULD BE ISSUED.
(C) (1) A PERMIT ISSUED TO AN ORGANIZATION UNDER THIS SECTION
MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED.
(2) THE PERMIT SHALL STATE THAT THE RAFFLE IS REQUIRED TO BE
MANAGED AND OPERATED ONLY BY MEMBERS OF THE ORGANIZATION OBTAINING
THE PERMIT.
(D) (1) (I) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
DESIGNATED CITY AGENCY MAY ISSUE A SINGLE PERMIT TO AN ORGANIZATION TO
HOLD RAFFLES AT MULTIPLE PROFESSIONAL MAJOR LEAGUE BASEBALL GAMES
PLAYED IN BALTIMORE CITY.
(II) THERE IS NO LIMIT ON THE NUMBER OF RAFFLES THAT AN
ORGANIZATION MAY CONDUCT IN CONJUNCTION WITH PROFESSIONAL MAJOR
LEAGUE BASEBALL GAMES PLAYED IN BALTIMORE CITY.
(2) A PERMIT TO HOLD RAFFLES AT MULTIPLE PROFESSIONAL
MAJOR LEAGUE BASEBALL GAMES PLAYED IN BALTIMORE CITY EXPIRES AT THE
END OF THE CALENDAR YEAR IN WHICH THE PERMIT IS ISSUED.
(E) AN ORGANIZATION CONDUCTING A RAFFLE MAY:
(1) SET THE PRICE OF RAFFLE TICKETS; AND
(2) AWARD PRIZES IN MERCHANDISE AND MONEY IN ANY AMOUNT.
(F) AN ORGANIZATION CONDUCTING A RAFFLE MAY NOT ALLOW AN
INDIVIDUAL OR GROUP OF INDIVIDUALS TO:
(1) BENEFIT FINANCIALLY FROM THE RAFFLE; OR
(2) RECEIVE ANY OF THE PROCEEDS OF THE RAFFLE FOR PERSONAL
USE OR BENEFIT.

HOUSE BILL 399
(G) (1) A RAFFLE TICKET SOLD BY AN ORGANIZATION IN CONJUNCTION
WITH A PROFESSIONAL MAJOR LEAGUE BASEBALL GAME PLAYED IN BALTIMORE
CITY:
(I) MAY BE SOLD ONLY USING AGE–VERIFICATION MEASURES
TO ENSURE THAT THE BUYER IS AT LEAST 18 YEARS OLD;
(I) (II) MAY BE SOLD AND RECEIVED IN PERSON OR ON AN
ELECTRONIC DEVICE ONLY WITHIN THE GEOGRAPHICAL BOUNDARIES OF
BALTIMORE CITY DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) (III) SHALL BE SOLD AND RECEIVED NOT EARLIER THAN 1
HOUR BEFORE THE OFFICIAL START OF THE BASEBALL GAME AND NOT LATER THAN
THE SEVENTH INNING OF THAT BASEBALL GAME.
(2) AN ORGANIZATION CONDUCTING A RAFFLE UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL USE A GEOFENCE TO ENSURE THAT RAFFLE TICKETS SOLD AND RECEIVED ON
AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE ARE SOLD AND RECEIVED WITHIN THE GEOGRAPHICAL
BOUNDARIES OF BALTIMORE CITY THE PROFESSIONAL MAJOR LEAGUE BASEBALL
STADIUM.
13–510.
(a) A person may not knowingly conduct or attempt to conduct a bazaar or raffle
in violation of §§ 13–503 through 13–505 AND 13–505.1 of this subtitle.
(b) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction
is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 1 year or a fine not exceeding $1,000 or both.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of May 31, 2028,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.